North Carolina statutes. Chapter 115D. Community Colleges.
Article 2. Local Administration.
§ 115D-21.
Traffic regulations; fines and penalties.

All of the provisions of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes relating to the use of highways of the State of North Carolina and the operation of motor vehicles thereon shall apply to the streets, roads, alleys and driveways on the campuses of all institutions in the North Carolina Community College System. Any person violating any of the provisions of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes in or on the streets, roads, alleys and driveways on the campuses of institutions in the North Carolina Community College System shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished as prescribed in this section and as provided by Chapter 20 of the General Statutes relating to motor vehicles. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as in any way interfering with the ownership and control of the streets, roads, alleys and driveways on the campuses of institutions in the system as is now vested by law in the trustees of each individual institution in the North Carolina Community College System.

The trustees are authorized and empowered to make additional rules and regulations and to adopt additional ordinances with respect to the use of the streets, roads, alleys and driveways and to establish parking areas on or off the campuses not inconsistent with the provisions of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes of North Carolina. Upon investigation, the trustees may determine and fix speed limits on streets, roads, alleys, and driveways subject to such rules, regulations, and ordinances, lower than those provided in

G.S. 20-141

. The trustees may make reasonable provisions for the towing or removal of unattended vehicles found to be in violation of rules, regulations and ordinances. All rules, regulations and ordinances adopted pursuant to the authority of this section shall be recorded in the proceedings of the trustees; shall be printed; and copies of such rules, regulations and ordinances shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State of North Carolina. Violation of any such rules, regulations, or ordinances, is an infraction punishable by a penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).Regardless of whether an institution does its own removal and disposal of motor vehicles or contracts with another person to do so, the institution shall provide a hearing procedure for the owner. For purposes of this subsection, the definitions in

G.S. 20-219.9

apply:

If the institution operates in such a way that the person who tows the vehicle is responsible for collecting towing fees, all provisions of Article 7A, Chapter 20, apply.

If the institution operates in such a way that it is responsible for collecting towing fees, it shall:

Provide by contract or ordinance for a schedule of reasonable towing fees,

Provide a procedure for a prompt fair hearing to contest the towing,

Provide for an appeal to district court from that hearing,

Authorize release of the vehicle at any time after towing by the posting of a bond or paying of the fees due, and

If the institution chooses to enforce its authority by sale of the vehicle, provide a sale procedure similar to that provided in

G.S. 44A-4

, 44A-5, and 44A-6, except that no hearing in addition to the probable cause hearing is required. If no one purchases the vehicle at the sale and if the value of the vehicle is less than the amount of the lien, the institution may destroy it.

The trustees may by rules, regulations, or ordinances provide for a system of registration of all motor vehicles where the owner or operator does park on the campus or keeps said vehicle on the campus. The trustees shall cause to be posted at appropriate places on campus notice to the public of applicable parking and traffic rules, regulations, and ordinances governing the campus over which it has jurisdiction. The trustees may by rules, regulations, or ordinances establish or cause to have established a system of citations that may be issued to owners or operators of motor vehicles who violate established rules, regulations, or ordinances. The trustees shall provide for the administration of said system of citations; establish or cause to be established a system of fines to be levied for the violation of established rules, regulations and ordinances; and enforce or cause to be enforced the collection of said fines. The fine for each offense shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The trustees shall be empowered to exercise the right to prohibit repeated violators of such rules, regulations, or ordinances from parking on the campus.

The clear proceeds of all civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1971, c. 795, ss. 1-3; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; 1983, c. 420, s. 4; 1985, c. 764, s. 38; 2012-142, s. 8.9.

Cross References.

As to post-towing procedure for motor vehicles towed pursuant to the provisions of this section, see

G.S. 20-219.9

et seq.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 8.9, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00), which funds shall be retained in the institution and expended in the discretion of the trustees” in the fifth sentence of subsection (c), and added subsection (d).

§ 115D-21.1.
Campus law enforcement agencies.

The board of trustees of any community college may establish a campus law enforcement agency and employ campus police officers. These officers shall meet the requirements of Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes, shall take the oath of office prescribed by Article VI, Section 7 of the Constitution, and shall have all the powers of law enforcement officers generally. The territorial jurisdiction of a campus police officer shall include all property owned or leased to the community college employing the officer and that portion of any public road or highway passing through the property and immediately adjoining it, wherever located.

The board of trustees of any community college that establishes a campus law enforcement agency under subsection (a) of this section may enter into joint agreements with the governing board of any municipality to extend the law enforcement authority of campus police officers into the municipality’s jurisdiction and to determine the circumstances under which this extension of authority may be granted.

The board of trustees of any community college that establishes a campus law enforcement agency under subsection (a) of this section may enter into joint agreements with the governing board of any county, with the consent of the sheriff, to extend the law enforcement authority of campus police officers into the county’s jurisdiction and to determine the circumstances under which this extension of authority may be granted.

History.

1999-68, s. 1.

§§ 115D-21.2 through 115D-21.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 115D-21.5.
NC Career Coach Program.

Purpose. — There is established the NC Career Coach Program to place community college career coaches in high schools to assist students with determining career goals and identifying community college programs that would enable students to achieve these goals.

Memorandum of Understanding. — The board of trustees of a community college and a local board of education of a local school administrative unit within the service area of the community college shall enter into a memorandum of understanding for the placement of career coaches employed by the board of trustees of the community college in schools within the local school administrative unit. At a minimum, the memorandum of understanding shall include the following:

Requirement that the community college provides the following:

Hiring, training, and supervision of career coaches. The board of trustees may include a local board of education liaison on the hiring committee to participate in the decision making regarding hiring for the coach positions.

Salary, benefits, and all other expenses related to the employment of the career coach. The coach will be an employee of the board of trustees and will not be an agent or employee of the local board of education.

Development of pedagogical materials and technologies needed to enhance the advising process.

Criminal background checks required by the local school administrative unit for employees working directly with students.

Agreement that, while on any school campus, the career coach will obey all local board of education rules and will be subject to the authority of the school building administration.

Requirement that the local school administrative unit provides the following to career coaches:

Access to student records, as needed to carry out the coach’s job responsibilities.

Office space on site appropriate for student advising.

Information technology resources, including, but not limited to, Internet access, telephone, and copying.

Initial school orientation and ongoing integration into the faculty and staff community.

Promotion of school-wide awareness of coach duties.

Facilitation of coach’s access to individual classes and larger assemblies for the purposes of awareness-building.

Application for NC Career Coach Program Funding. — The board of trustees of a community college and a local board of education of a local school administrative unit within the service area of the community college jointly may apply for available funds for NC Career Coach Program funding from the State Board of Community Colleges. The State Board of Community Colleges shall establish a process for award of funds as follows:

Advisory committee. — Establishment of an advisory committee, which shall include representatives from the NC Community College System, the Department of Public Instruction, the Department of Commerce, and at least three representatives of the business community, to review applications and make recommendations for funding awards to the State Board.

Application submission requirements. — The State Board of Community Colleges shall require at least the following:

Evidence of a signed memorandum of understanding that meets, at a minimum, the requirements of this section.

Evidence that the funding request will be matched with local funds in accordance with the following:

Matching funds may come from public or private sources.

The match amount shall be determined based on the development tier designation of the county in which the local school administrative unit is located where the career coach is assigned on the date of the award of funds by the State Board of Community Colleges according to the following:

If located in a tier one county as defined in G.S. 143B-437.08, no local match shall be required.

If located in a tier two county as defined in G.S. 143B-437.08, one dollar ($1.00) of local funds for every two dollars ($2.00) in State funds shall be required.

If located in a tier three county as defined in G.S. 143B-437.08, one dollar ($1.00) of local funds for every one dollar ($1.00) in State funds shall be required.

(3)

Awards criteria. —

The State Board of Community Colleges shall develop criteria for consideration in determining the award of funds that shall include the following:

a.

Consideration of the workforce needs of business and industry in the region.

b.

Targeting of resources to enhance ongoing economic activity within the community college service area and surrounding counties.

Geographic diversity of awards.

Annual Report. —

The board of trustees of a community college that employs one or more career coaches shall report annually to the State Board of Community Colleges on implementation and outcomes of the program, including the following information:

Number of career coaches employed.

Number of local school administrative units served and names of schools in which career coaches are placed.

Number of students annually counselled by career coaches.

Impact of career coaches on student choices, as determined by a valid measure selected by the State Board of Community Colleges.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall report annually no later than October 1 to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the following:

A compilation of the information reported by the board of trustees of community colleges, as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Number and names of partnership applicants for NC Career Coach Program funding.

Number, names, and amounts of those awarded NC Career Coach Program funding.

History.

2015-241, s. 10.14(a); 2018-5, s. 9.3; 2019-235, s. 3.3.

§ 115D-22.
State Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; social security.

Solely for the purpose of applying the provisions of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes of North Carolina, “Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees, Social Security,” the institutions of this Chapter are included within the definition of the term “public school,” and the institutional employees are included within the definition of the term “teacher,” as these terms are defined in

G.S. 135-1

.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2.

§ 115D-23.
Workers’ Compensation Act applicable to institutional employees.

The provisions of Chapter 97 of the General Statutes of North Carolina, the Workers’ Compensation Act, shall apply to all institutional employees. The State Board of Community Colleges shall make the necessary arrangements to carry out those provisions of Chapter 97 which are applicable to employees whose wages are paid in whole or in part from State funds. The State shall be liable for compensation, based upon the average weekly wage as defined in the act, of an employee regardless of the portion of his wage paid from other than State funds.

The board of trustees of each institution shall be liable for workers’ compensation for employees whose salaries or wages are paid by the board entirely from local public or special funds. Each board of trustees is authorized to purchase insurance to cover workers’ compensation liability and to include the cost of insurance in the annual budget of the institution.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any person, firm or corporation making voluntary contributions to institutions for any purpose, and such a person, firm, or corporation shall not be liable for the payment of any sum of money under the provisions of this section.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 714, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1.

§ 115D-24.
Waiver of governmental immunity from liability for negligence of agents and employees of institutions; liability insurance.

The board of trustees of any institution, by obtaining liability insurance as provided in G.S. 115D-53, is authorized to waive its governmental immunity from liability for the death or injury of person or for property damage caused by the negligence or tort of any agent or employee of the board of trustees when the agent or employee is acting within the scope of his authority or the course of his employment. All automobiles, buses, trucks, or other motor vehicles intended primarily for use on the public roads and highways which are the property of a board of trustees shall be insured at all times with liability insurance as provided in G.S. 115D-53. Governmental immunity shall be deemed to have been waived by the act of obtaining liability insurance, but only to the extent that the board is indemnified for the negligence or torts of its agents and employees and only as to claims arising after the procurement of liability insurance and while such insurance is in force.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2.

§ 115D-25.
Purchase of annuity or retirement income contracts for employees by local boards of trustees.

Notwithstanding any provision of law relating to salaries or salary schedules for the pay of faculty members, administrative officers, or any other employees of community colleges, the board of trustees of any of the above institutions may authorize the finance officer or agent of same to enter into annual contracts with any of the above officers, agents and employees which provide for reductions in salaries below the total established compensation or salary schedule for a term of one year. The financial officer or agent shall use the funds derived from the reduction in the salary of the officer, agent or employee to purchase a nonforfeitable annuity or retirement income contract for the benefit of said officer, agent or employee. An officer, agent or employee who has agreed to a salary reduction for this purpose shall not have the right to receive the amount of the salary reduction in cash or in any other way except the annuity or retirement income contract. Funds used for the purchase of an annuity or retirement income contract shall not be in lieu of any amount earned by the officer, agent or employee before his election for a salary reduction has become effective. The agreement for salary reductions referred to in this section shall be effected under any necessary regulations and procedures adopted by the State Board of Community Colleges and on forms prepared by the State Board of Community Colleges. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section or law, the amount by which the salary of an officer, agent or employee is reduced pursuant to this section shall not be excluded, but shall be included, in computing and making payroll deductions for social security and retirement system purposes, and in computing and providing matching funds for retirement system purposes.

In lieu of the annuity and related contracts provided for under this section, interests in custodial accounts pursuant to Section 401(f), Section 403(b)(7), and related sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as amended may be purchased by local boards of trustees for the benefit of qualified employees under this section with the funds derived from the reduction in the salaries of such employees.

History.

1965, c. 366; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1987, c. 564, s. 11; 1989, c. 526, s. 2; 2015-169, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-169, s. 1, effective October 1, 2015, inserted “by local boards of trustees” in the section heading; and inserted “by local boards of trustees” near the middle of the second paragraph.

§ 115D-25.1.
Dependent care assistance program.

The State Board of Community Colleges is authorized to provide eligible employees of constituent institutions a program of dependent care assistance as available under Section 129 and related sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The State Board may authorize constituent institutions to enter into annual agreements with employees who elect to participate in the program to provide for a reduction in salary. With the approval of the Director of the Budget, savings in the employer’s share of contributions under the Federal Insurance Contributions Act on account of the reduction in salary may be used to pay some or all of the administrative expenses of the program. Should the State Board decide to contract with a third party to administer the terms and conditions of a program of dependent care assistance, it may select a contractor only upon a thorough and completely competitive procurement process.

History.

1989, c. 458, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 14(c); 1993, c. 561, s. 42; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.28A; 1997-443, s. 33.20(a); 1999-237, s. 28.27(a).

§ 115D-25.2.
Flexible Compensation Plan.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law relating to the salaries of employees of community college boards of trustees, the State Board of Community Colleges is authorized to provide a plan of flexible compensation to eligible employees of constituent institutions for benefits available under Section 125 and related sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as amended. This plan shall not include those benefits provided to employees under Articles 1, 3B, and 6 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes nor any vacation leave, sick leave, or any other leave that may be carried forward from year to year by employees as a form of deferred compensation. If a plan of flexible compensation is offered, then a TRICARE supplement shall be offered. In providing a plan of flexible compensation, the State Board may authorize constituent institutions to enter into agreements with their employees for reductions in the salaries of employees electing to participate in the plan of flexible compensation provided by this section. With the approval of the Director of the Budget, savings in the employer’s share of contributions under the Federal Insurance Contributions Act on account of the reduction in salary may be used to pay some or all of the administrative expenses of the program. Should the State Board decide to contract with a third party to administer the terms and conditions of a plan of flexible compensation as provided by this section, it may select such a contractor only upon a thorough and completely advertised competitive procurement process.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1059, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 14(g); 1993, c. 561, s. 42; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.28A; 1997-443, s. 33.20(a); 1999-237, s. 28.27(a); 2013-292, s. 2.

§ 115D-25.3.
Voluntary shared leave.

The State Board of Community Colleges, in cooperation with the State Board of Education and the State Human Resources Commission, shall adopt rules and policies to allow any employee at a community college to share leave voluntarily with an immediate family member who is an employee of a community college, public school, or State agency; and with a coworker’s immediate family member who is an employee of a community college, public school, or State agency. For the purposes of this section, the term “immediate family member” means a spouse, parent, child, brother, sister, grandparent, or grandchild. The term includes the step, half, and in-law relationships. The term “coworker” means that the employee donating the leave is employed by the same agency, department, institution, university, local school administrative unit, or community college as the employee whose immediate family member is receiving the leave.

The State Board of Community Colleges, in cooperation with the State Human Resources Commission, shall adopt rules and policies consistent with policies of the Commission to allow any employee at a community college to share leave voluntarily with a nonfamily member who is an employee of a community college. A community college employee who donates sick leave to a community college employee who is a nonfamily member shall not donate more than five days of sick leave per year to any one nonfamily community college employee. The combined total of sick leave donated to a community college employee from nonfamily community college employee donors shall not exceed 20 days per year. Donated sick leave shall not be used for retirement purposes and community college employees who donate sick leave shall be notified in writing of the consequences of donating sick leave in regard to State retirement system service credit.

History.

2003-9, s. 3; 2003-284, s. 30.14A(c); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2016-94, s. 36.19.

Cross References.

As to voluntary shared leave for public school employees, see

G.S. 115C-12.2

.

As to voluntary shared leave for employees of state agencies, see

G.S. 126-8.3

.

§ 115D-25.4.
Department of State Treasurer-sponsored 403(b) option.

In addition to the opportunities for local boards of trustees to offer section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 retirement annuities and/or mutual funds to their employees under

G.S. 115D-25

, local boards of trustees may also offer the “North Carolina Public School Teachers’ and Professional Educators’ Investment Plan” as operated by the Department of State Treasurer.

The criteria in this subsection apply to the Department of State Treasurer’s 403(b) offerings to employees of local boards of trustees under this section:

Annuity contracts, trust accounts, and/or custodial accounts shall be administered by a qualified third-party administrator that shall, under written agreement with the Department of State Treasurer, provide custodial, record-keeping, and administrative services. The third-party administrator may also be the selected vendor for the North Carolina Public School Teachers’ and Professional Educators’ Investment Plan.For local boards of trustees as employers choosing to participate in the North Carolina Public School Teachers’ and Professional Educators’ Investment Plan, the third-party administrator shall, at a minimum, provide the following:

Maintain a written plan document.

Review hardship withdrawal requests, loan requests, and other disbursements permitted under section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

Maintain specimen salary reduction agreements for the employer and employees of that employer to initiate payroll deferrals.

Monitor maximum contributions.

Coordinate responses to the Internal Revenue Service in any case of an IRS audit.

Generate educational communication materials to employees concerning the enrollment process, program eligibility, and investment options.

Maintain internal reports to ensure compliance with section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code and Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

Provide compliance monitoring/oversight for all 403(b) plans established under

G.S. 115D-25

within each participating local board of trustees plan by creating and establishing the necessary connections and processes with existing and future vendors.

Keep an updated schedule of vendor fees and commissions as to the Department’s statewide plan of 403(b) offerings.

Governance and oversight of the North Carolina Public School Teachers’ and Professional Educators’ Investment Plan will be performed under Article 5 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes by the Department of State Treasurer and the Supplemental Retirement Board of Trustees established pursuant to

G.S. 135-96

. Because of the administrative and record-keeping duties enumerated in subdivision (1) of this subsection, any existing vendor of a 403(b) with a participating employer must either agree to share data with the State’s 403(b) vendor under this provision (so as to permit oversight over contribution limits, loans, and hardship withdrawals) or be directed by the participating employer to cease accepting new contributions, loans, and hardship withdrawals.

Investment options shall be solely determined by the Department of State Treasurer and the Supplemental Retirement Board of Trustees consistent with section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

Investment staff of the Department of State Treasurer may make recommendations to the State Treasurer and the Supplemental Retirement Board of Trustees as to appropriate investment options. Pursuant to

G.S. 135-96

, the State Treasurer and Board of Trustees shall have sole responsibility for the selection of the vendor, third-party administrator, providers of investment options, and any other service provider for the North Carolina Public School Teachers’ and Professional Educators’ Investment Plan.

All contributions made in accordance with the provisions of section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and this section shall be remitted directly to the administrator and held by the administrator in a custodial account on behalf of each participating employee. Any investment gains or losses shall be credited to those accounts. The forms of payment and disbursement procedures shall be consistent with those generally offered by similar annuity contracts, trust accounts, and custodial accounts and applicable federal and State statutes governing those contracts and accounts.

Any local board of trustees may elect to make contributions to the employee’s account on behalf of the employee. The local board of trustees shall take whatever action is necessary to implement this section.

The design and administration of annuity contracts, trust accounts, and custodial accounts under this provision shall comply with all applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

The administrative costs of the North Carolina Public School Teachers’ and Professional Educators’ Investment Plan may be charged to members or deducted from members’ accounts in accordance with nondiscriminatory procedures established by the Department of State Treasurer and Board of Trustees.

History.

2015-169, s. 2; 2016-108, s. 7(b); 2020-48, s. 1.15.

§ 115D-26.
Conflict of interest.

All local trustees and employees of community colleges covered under this Chapter are subject to the conflict of interest provisions found in

G.S. 14-234

.

History.

1981, c. 157, s. 5; 1987, c. 564, s. 9; 2001-409, s. 5.